Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB765.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Articles II(t) and IX of section 1 of the act of June 25, 1931 (P.L.1352, No.332), referred to as the Delaware River Joint Toll Bridge Compact, are amended to read:ARTICLE II.For the effectuation of its authorized purposes, the 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526 commission is hereby granted the following powers as limited and supplemented by the act of July 1, 1996 (P.L.457, No.70), entitled "A supplement to the act of June 25, 1931 (P.L.1352, No.332), entitled 'An act providing for joint action by the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania and the State of New Jersey in the administration, operation, and maintenance of bridges over the Delaware River, and for the construction of additional bridge facilities across said river; authorizing the Governor, for these purposes, to enter into an agreement with the State of New Jersey; creating a Delaware River Joint Toll Bridge Commission and specifying the powers and duties thereof, including the power to finance the construction of additional bridges by the issuance of revenue bonds to be redeemed from revenues derived from tolls collected at such bridges; transferring to said commission all powers now exercised by existing commission created to acquire toll bridges over the Delaware River; and making an appropriation,' requiring the commission to adopt competitive purchasing, equal opportunity employment and competitive hiring practices":* * *(t) To petition the Interstate Commerce Commission, any public service or public utilities commission, or any other federal, state or local authority, whether administrative, judicial or legislative, for the adoption and execution of any physical improvement, change in method, rate of transportation, system of handling freight, warehousing, docking, lightering or transfer of freight, which, in the opinion of the commission, may be designed to improve or facilitate the movement or handling of commerce within the district or improve the terminal or transportation facilities therein.20250HB0765PN0789 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 As used in this agreement, the term 'port and terminal facilities' shall mean and shall include, without intending thereby to limit the definition of such term, any one or more of the following or any combination thereof:(1) Every kind of terminal or storage structure or facility now in use or hereafter designed for use in the handling, storage, loading or unloading of freight or passengers at steamship, railroad or motor terminals or airports, and every kind of transportation facility now in use or hereafter designed for use in connection therewith; and(2) All real and personal property and all works, buildings, structures, equipment, machinery, appliances and appurtenances necessary or convenient for the proper construction, equipment, maintenance and operation of such facility or facilities or any one or more of them.Notwithstanding any other provision of this agreement or any provision of law, state or federal, to the contrary, the commission shall not combine for financing purposes any port and terminal facility or facilities constructed or acquired by it under the provisions of this agreement with any bridge or bridges heretofore or hereafter constructed or acquired by the commission.The powers herein granted to the commission with reference to port and terminal facilities shall supersede the right to exercise any such powers within the district, as defined in paragraph (e) of Article I of this agreement, by any other body which has been heretofore created by compact or agreement between the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania and the State of New Jersey.Nothing contained in any other of the provisions of this 20250HB0765PN0789 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 compact or agreement shall be deemed or construed to amend, modify or repeal any of the powers, rights or duties conferred by, or limitations or restrictions expressed in, Article X of this compact or agreement, or any of the provisions of said Article X relating to a bridge to be constructed, operated and maintained by the Pennsylvania Turnpike Commission or the New Jersey Turnpike Authority acting alone or in conjunction with each other.Notwithstanding the above, each state reserves the right to provide by law for the exercise of a veto power by the Governor of that state over any action of any commissioner from that state at any time within ten days, Saturdays, Sundays and public holidays in the particular state excepted, after receipt at the Governor's office of a certified copy of the minutes of the meeting at which such vote was taken. Each state may provide by law for the manner of delivery of the minutes, and for notification of the action on the minutes.ARTICLE IX.The commission shall make annual reports to the Governors and Legislatures of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania and the State of New Jersey setting forth in detail its operations and transactions, and may make such additional reports from time to time to the Governors and Legislatures, as it may deem advisable.[The commission shall submit biennially to a performance audit jointly conducted by the Auditor General of Pennsylvania and the State Auditor of New Jersey, which shall include expenditures and operations of the commission. These auditors shall complete the performance audit and prepare a joint report by December 31 of every odd-numbered year, with the first audit 20250HB0765PN0789 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and report to be completed by December 31, 1997. A report of those audits shall be submitted to the Governors and Legislatures of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania and the State of New Jersey and to the Delaware River Joint Toll Bridge Commission.An annual financial audit shall be conducted at the expense of the commission by an independent accounting firm in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles. A written report of each audit shall be submitted to the commission and shall be retained by the commission for at least five years.]The Auditor General of Pennsylvania and the State Auditor of New Jersey shall jointly conduct annual financial and management audits of expenditures and operations of the commission and shall submit a report of those audits to the Governors and Legislatures of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania and the State of New Jersey.Section 2. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1.1. The following apply to minutes of meetings of the Delaware River Joint Toll Bridge Commission:(1) The minutes of every meeting of the Delaware River Joint Toll Bridge Commission shall, as soon as possible after the meeting, be delivered by, and under the certification of, the secretary of the commission to the Governor.(2) No action taken by a Pennsylvania commissioner at the meeting may have force or effect for a period of ten (10) days, except Saturdays, Sundays and Commonwealth public holidays, after the minutes have been delivered to the Governor under this section, unless the Governor approves the minutes or any part of the minutes, in writing by reciting the action approved, within 20250HB0765PN0789 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the ten-day period. This veto power may not be construed to affect the covenants contained in the bonds of the commission.(3) The Governor shall return the minutes to the Delaware River Joint Toll Bridge Commission, not later than the ten-day period prescribed in paragraph (2), either with or without a veto of any action recited in the minutes to have been taken by a commissioner appointed from Pennsylvania.(4) If the Governor does not return the minutes within the ten-day period, the action taken by the Pennsylvania commissioners shall have the force and effect as recited in the minutes, according to the wording of the minutes. If the Governor, within the ten-day period prescribed in paragraph (2), returns the minutes of the Delaware River Joint Toll Bridge Commission with a veto against the action of that commissioner from Pennsylvania, the action of that commissioner shall be null and void and of no effect.(5) The commission shall designate an individual who shall be responsible for responding to requests from the public and the news media for information concerning the scheduling, attendance and minutes of commission meetings.Section 3. The Governor may not enter into a supplemental compact or agreement on behalf of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania until passage by the State of New Jersey of a substantially similar act embodying a supplemental compact or agreement between the two states.Section 4. The Governor shall transmit a notice of the date of execution of any supplemental compact or agreement referenced in section 3 to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin.Section 5. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB0765PN0789 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930